test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-kîsihtâw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - kîsihtâw : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nikîsihtân   # I complete something, I finish something, I finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kikîsihtân   # you complete something, you finish something, you finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: kîsihtâw   # he/she completes something, he/she finishes something, he/she finishes work on something

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kîsihtâyân   # as I complete something, as I finish something, as I finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kîsihtâyan, î-kîsihtâyin]   # as you complete something, as you finish something, as you finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kîsihtât   # as he/she completes something, as he/she finishes something, as he/she finishes work on something

      # Imp
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: kîsihtâ   # (you) complete something now, (you) finish something now, (you) finish work on something now
      

      # Prs # Ind
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nikîsihtân   # I complete something, I finish something, I finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kikîsihtân   # you complete something, you finish something, you finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: kîsihtâw   # he/she completes something, he/she finishes something, he/she finishes work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nikîsihtânân   # we complete something, we finish something, we finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kikîsihtânaw, kikîsihtânânaw]   # we and you complete something, we and you finish something, we and you finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kikîsihtânâwâw   # you all complete something, you all finish something, you all finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: kîsihtâwak   # they complete something, they finish something, they finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kîsihtâthiwa   # another/others complete something, another/others finish something, another/others finish work on something
      kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+X: [kîsihtâniwiw, kîsihtâniwan]   # someone completes something, someone finishes something, someone finishes work on something
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kîsihtâyân   # as I complete something, as I finish something, as I finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kîsihtâyan, î-kîsihtâyin]   # as you complete something, as you finish something, as you finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kîsihtât   # as he/she completes something, as he/she finishes something, as he/she finishes work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kîsihtâyâhk   # as we complete something, as we finish something, as we finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kîsihtâyahk   # as we and you complete something, as we and you finish something, as we and you finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kîsihtâyîk   # as you all complete something, as you all finish something, as you all finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-kîsihtâcik, î-kîsihtâtwâw]   # as they complete something, as they finish something, as they finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kîsihtâthit   # as another/others complete something, as another/others finish something, as another/others finish work on something
      PV/î+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [î-kîsihtâniwik, î-kîsihtâniwahk, î-kîsihtâhk]   # as someone completes something, as someone finishes something, as someone finishes work on something
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-kîsihtân   # I completed something, I finished something, I finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-kîsihtân   # you completed something, you finished something, you finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: kî-kîsihtâw   # he/she completed something, he/she finished something, he/she finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-kîsihtânân   # we completed something, we finished something, we finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kikî-kîsihtânaw, kikî-kîsihtânânaw]   # we and you completed something, we and you finished something, we and you finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-kîsihtânâwâw   # you all completed something, you all finished something, you all finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: kî-kîsihtâwak   # they completed something, they finished something, they finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-kîsihtâthiwa   # another/others completed something, another/others finished something, another/others finished work on something
      PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+X: [kî-kîsihtâniwiw, kî-kîsihtâniwan]   # someone completed something, someone finished something, someone finished work on something
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-kîsihtâyân   # as I completed something, as I finished something, as I finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kî-kîsihtâyan, î-kî-kîsihtâyin]   # as you completed something, as you finished something, as you finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-kîsihtât   # as he/she completed something, as he/she finished something, as he/she finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-kîsihtâyâhk   # as we completed something, as we finished something, as we finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-kîsihtâyahk   # as we and you completed something, as we and you finished something, as we and you finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-kîsihtâyîk   # as you all completed something, as you all finished something, as you all finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-kî-kîsihtâcik, î-kî-kîsihtâtwâw]   # as they completed something, as they finished something, as they finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-kîsihtâthit   # as another/others completed something, as another/others finished something, as another/others finished work on something
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [î-kî-kîsihtâniwik, î-kî-kîsihtâniwahk, î-kî-kîsihtâhk]   # as someone completed something, as someone finished something, as someone finished work on something
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-kîsihtân   # I am going to complete something, I am going to finish something, I am going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-kîsihtân   # you are going to complete something, you are going to finish something, you are going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: wî-kîsihtâw   # he/she is going to complete something, he/she is going to finish something, he/she is going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-kîsihtânân   # we are going to complete something, we are going to finish something, we are going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kiwî-kîsihtânaw, kiwî-kîsihtânânaw]   # we and you are going to complete something, we and you are going to finish something, we and you are going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-kîsihtânâwâw   # you all are going to complete something, you all are going to finish something, you all are going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: wî-kîsihtâwak   # they are going to complete something, they are going to finish something, they are going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-kîsihtâthiwa   # another/others are going to complete something, another/others are going to finish something, another/others are going to finish work on something
      PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+X: [wî-kîsihtâniwiw, wî-kîsihtâniwan]   # someone is going to complete something, someone is going to finish something, someone is going to finish work on something
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-kîsihtâyân   # as I am going to complete something, as I am going to finish something, as I am going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-wî-kîsihtâyan, î-wî-kîsihtâyin]   # as you are going to complete something, as you are going to finish something, as you are going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-kîsihtât   # as he/she is going to complete something, as he/she is going to finish something, as he/she is going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-kîsihtâyâhk   # as we are going to complete something, as we are going to finish something, as we are going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-kîsihtâyahk   # as we and you are going to complete something, as we and you are going to finish something, as we and you are going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-kîsihtâyîk   # as you all are going to complete something, as you all are going to finish something, as you all are going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-wî-kîsihtâcik, î-wî-kîsihtâtwâw]   # as they are going to complete something, as they are going to finish something, as they are going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-kîsihtâthit   # as another/others are going to complete something, as another/others are going to finish something, as another/others are going to finish work on something
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Cnj+X: [î-wî-kîsihtâniwik, î-wî-kîsihtâniwahk, î-wî-kîsihtâhk]   # as someone is going to complete something, as someone is going to finish something, as someone is going to finish work on something
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nika-kîsihtân   # I will complete something, I will finish something, I will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kika-kîsihtân   # you will complete something, you will finish something, you will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: ka-kîsihtâw   # he/she will complete something, he/she will finish something, he/she will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nika-kîsihtânân   # we will complete something, we will finish something, we will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kika-kîsihtânaw, kika-kîsihtânânaw]   # we and you will complete something, we and you will finish something, we and you will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kika-kîsihtânâwâw   # you all will complete something, you all will finish something, you all will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: ka-kîsihtâwak   # they will complete something, they will finish something, they will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-kîsihtâthiwa   # another/others will complete something, another/others will finish something, another/others will finish work on something
      PV/ka+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Ind+X: [ka-kîsihtâniwiw, ka-kîsihtâniwan]   # someone will complete something, someone will finish something, someone will finish work on something
      
